Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.905

Severability—Construction—1977 ex.s. c 302.

(1) If any provision of this chapter, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, is not affected.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall be effective retroactively to July 1, 1974.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 302 s 12.]